test/src/morphology/N-seeji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sēji*: # Noun 186 'eng /est sööja/fin' - full paradigm
     sēji*+N+Sg+Nom: sēji*
     sēji*+N+Sg+Gen: sējiz
     sēji*+N+Sg+Par: sējizt
     sēji*+N+Sg+Dat: sējizõn
     sēji*+N+Sg+Ins: sējizõks
     sēji*+N+Sg+Ill: sējizõ
     sēji*+N+Sg+Ela: sējizõst
     sēji*+N+Pl+Nom: sējid
     sēji*+N+Pl+Gen: sējid
     sēji*+N+Pl+Par: sējidi
     sēji*+N+Pl+Dat: sējidõn
     sēji*+N+Pl+Ins: sējidõks
     sēji*+N+Pl+Ill: sējiž
     sēji*+N+Pl+Ela: sējisti
